Hawaii, session 2026, SB2373.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that climate change is occurring as a result of human activity, particularly the burning of fossil fuels and the concomitant release of carbon dioxide.  Thirty-four per cent of Hawaii's coastlines are vulnerable to intensifying coastal hazards resulting from accelerating sea level rise, according to a study performed by researchers at the university of Hawaii. The legislature further finds that in response to the growing threat of climate change, the State has set standards and launched initiatives to expand reliance on renewable energy, including setting a statewide benchmark of generating one hundred per cent of the State's electricity through renewable resources by 2045 and establishing a goal for the statewide greenhouse gas emissions limit to be at least fifty per cent below 2005 levels by 2030. The legislature additionally finds that, when S.C.R. No. 115, H.D. 1 (2025) was adopted, it affirmed the importance of marine ecosystem restoration in achieving the State's decarbonization goals. Notably, this resolution also reasserted a commitment to strengthening carbon accounting methodologies to assist in the quantification and reduction of direct and indirect greenhouse gas emissions, including emissions reduction achieved through marine ecosystem restoration. The legislature also finds that the G7 Climate, Energy, and Environment Ministers' Communique issued on April 16, 2023, affirmed the importance of nature-based solutions, including marine ecosystem restoration, in halting and reversing biodiversity loss, mitigating the impacts of climate change, and preserving and enhancing carbon sinks. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to: (1)  Establish a goal of the State to strengthen nature-based solutions that reduce carbon emissions; (2)  Direct relevant state agencies that oversee natural resource management and carbon sequestration to identify opportunities for investing in nature-based solutions that reduce carbon emissions; and (3)  Authorize the Hawaii state energy office to evaluate and develop methodologies to assist in the quantification of carbon emissions reductions that may be attained through marine ecosystem restoration and other nature-based solutions. SECTION 2. Chapter 225P, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§225P-    Nature-based carbon sequestration.  (a)  It shall be the goal of the State to strengthen nature-based solutions that reduce direct and indirect carbon emissions, including initiatives that promote carbon sequestration through marine ecosystem restoration. (b) To the greatest extent possible, state agencies responsible for overseeing carbon sequestration and natural resource management shall identify opportunities for investing in nature-based solutions that reduce carbon emissions, including the restoration of oceanic, coastal, wetland, and other marine ecosystems. (c) The Hawaii state energy office may evaluate and develop methodologies to assist in the quantification of carbon emissions reductions that may be attained through marine ecosystem restoration and other nature-based solutions. (d) Any projects undertaken pursuant to this section shall be assessed for: (1)  Carbon sequestration potential; (2)  Conservation capacity; (3)  Ability to mitigate risk of natural emergencies, including wildfires; (4)  Financial sustainability; and (5)  Alignment with the States transition to a clean energy economy." SECTION 3. The Hawaii state energy office shall submit a report on its efforts to fulfill the purposes of this Act, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2027. SECTION 4. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________